Massachusetts, session 194th, H1848.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 87 of chapter 276 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following paragraph:-
“A judge may exercise discretion in placing a defendant on probation and consider the
following:
(i) age;
(ii) nature of the defendant’s military service, if any;
(iii) education;
(iv) injuries or wounds sustained;
(v) military discipline record, if the defendant served in the military;
of 2

(vi) past and current medical status;
(vii) family and medical psychological reports;
(viii) nature of past criminal convictions, if any;
(ix) age of previous criminal convictions, if any;
(x) employment status;
(xi) arrest record;
(xii) nature of current criminal matter and, if violent, the nature and extent of any injuries
to the victim and the relationship of victim to defendant;
(xiii) the availability of family and community support systems;
(xiv) the proposed probation terms; and
(xv) any other facts or circumstances having a bearing on pre-trial probation."
of 2